California, session 20252026, SB845.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 48800.8 is added to the Education Code, to read:48800.8. (a) A pupil concurrently enrolled in a community college course pursuant to Section 48800 or 48800.5 may participate in work-based learning activities consistent with Article 7 6.5 (commencing with Section 51759) 51755) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 when those activities are offered as a component of the community college course in which the pupil is enrolled and directly connected to the career technical education or academic learning objectives of that course.(b) Participation in work-based learning activities pursuant to subdivision (a) shall require the approval of the applicable authority provided in the concurrent enrollment authorization process in this article, and shall comply with all applicable labor laws governing minors.(c) A school district may award credit toward high school graduation for work-based learning activities completed pursuant to this section consistent with Section 51760.3. section.(d) This section shall not displace a community college district’s or college’s authority over the work-based learning component of a community college course described in subdivision (a).SEC. 2. Section 48930.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:48930.5. (a) A student body organization established pursuant to this article may operate a school-based student-led enterprise program, as defined in Section 51759, Section 51755, as part of a career technical education or academic program of study when the program is supervised, structured, and guided as a work-based learning activity consistent with Article 7 6.5 (commencing with Section 51759) 51755) of Chapter 5 of Part 28.(b) A school-based student-led enterprise program operated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted under the supervision of a certificated employee and governed by the policies of the governing board or body of the local educational agency. agency or state special school.SEC. 3. Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 51755) is added to Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: Article 6.5. Work-based Learning51755. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Apprenticeship program” means a comprehensive plan containing, among other things, apprenticeship program standards, committee rules and regulations, and related and supplemental instruction outlines and policy statements for the effective administration of the apprenticeable occupations pursuant to Section 3073 of the Labor Code.(b) “Apprenticeship program sponsor” means a joint apprenticeship committee, a unilateral labor or management committee, or an individual employer program.(c) “Apprenticeship program standards” means a written document containing, among other things, all the terms and conditions for the qualification, recruitment, selection, employment and training, working conditions, wages, employee benefits, and other compensation for apprentices and all other provisions and statements, including attachments, as required under the Labor Code and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of the Regulations, that when approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards constitute registration and authority to conduct that program of apprenticeship in the state.(d) “Early college credit” means college credit earned by a pupil through participation in courses and programs, including, but not limited to, dual enrollment, dual credit, early college, middle college, international baccalaureate, and advanced placement, before graduating high school.(e) “Internship” means a supervised, structured, and guided work-based learning activity training that takes place in a workplace for a limited period of time that (1) is connected to a school-based program or course, (2) involves supervision by both school and workplace employees, (3) provides career experience and educational benefits to the intern, (4) is limited to the timeframe during which the work-based learning activity provides the intern with beneficial learning, and (5) is more than 25 hours in one semester, intersession, or summer school session.(f) “Job shadowing experience” means a visit to a workplace for the purpose of career exploration for no less than three hours and no more than 25 hours in one semester, intersession, or summer school session.(g) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or regional occupation center or program operated by a county office of education or a joint powers authority.(h) “Mentorship” means a supervised, structured and guided work-based learning activity involving formal interactions between a youth participant and an adult mentor that (1) is established under the supervision and policies of the governing board or body of the local educational agency or state special school, (2) includes activities where the mentor offers career guidance to the mentee, (3) may include workplace mentoring where the local program matches a youth participant with an employer or employee of a company, and (4) may occur outside of class time or school hours.(i) “Preapprenticeship program” means a preapprenticeship program registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3100 of the Labor Code and Article 3 (commencing with Section 79140) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3.(j) “Related and supplemental instruction” means an organized and systematic form of instruction designed to provide the apprentice with knowledge including the theoretical and technical subjects related and supplemental to the skill or skills involved pursuant to Section 205 of Article 2 of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.(k) “Student-led enterprise program” means a supervised, structured, and guided work-based learning activity involving a school-based entrepreneurial program that is part of a career technical education or academic program of study, that integrates current industry standards, and that involves the development and operation of a revenue-generating business, regardless of profit or loss, provided under Article 2 (commencing with Section 48930) of Chapter 6 of Part 27.(l) “Work-based learning” means sustained interactions with industry or community professionals in real workplace settings, to the extent practicable, or sustained interactions with industry or community professionals in simulated environments at an educational institution that fosters in-depth, firsthand engagement with the tasks required in a given career field that are aligned to curriculum and instruction, that are conducted under the supervision of a certificated employee and governed by the policies of the governing board or body of the local educational agency or state special school.(m) (1) “Work experience education” means a course or program of study that (1) combines applied experiential learning in the workplace with classroom instruction, (2) integrates demonstrable learning outcomes for pupils, (3) is integrated into a pupil’s educational pathway to support career awareness and workplace skills development, (4) can be paid or unpaid, and (5) allows pupils to earn wages while gaining experience and academic credit.(2) “Work experience education” includes work experience education established by the governing board or body of a local educational agency or state special school pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 51759) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 10070) of Subchapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(n) “Youth apprentice” means a registered apprentice who meets all of the following:(1) Is at least 16 years of age.(2) Is enrolled full-time in high school in grade 10, 11, or 12, or is enrolled in an adult education program.(3) Is participating in a registered apprenticeship program with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, pursuant to Section 3368 of the Labor Code and Section 51769.(o) “Youth apprenticeship program” means an apprenticeship program registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards that fulfills all registered apprenticeship requirements and serves youth between 16 and 24 years of age at the time of enrollment and that also meets all of the following:(1) Offers related and supplemental instruction through career technical education, work experience education, or early college credit, whenever possible.(2) Complies with labor laws for minors.(3) Offers flexible work hours to allow for pupils to participate in on-the-job training while they are enrolled in high school.(4) Allows for part-time employment and extended completion time to accommodate youth apprentices.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 51759 is added to the Education Code, immediately preceding Section 51760, to read:51759. For purposes of this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply: definitions in Section 51755 apply.(a)“Apprenticeship program” means a comprehensive plan containing, among other things, apprenticeship program standards, committee rules and regulations, and related and supplemental instruction outlines and policy statements for the effective administration of the apprenticeable occupations pursuant to Section 3073 of the Labor Code.(b)“Apprenticeship program sponsor” means a joint apprenticeship committee, a unilateral labor or management committee, or an individual employer program.(c)“Apprenticeship program standards” means a written document containing, among other things, all the terms and conditions for the qualification, recruitment, selection, employment and training, working conditions, wages, employee benefits, and other compensation for apprentices and all other provisions and statements, including attachments, as required under the Labor Code and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of the Regulations, that when approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards constitute registration and authority to conduct that program of apprenticeship in the state.(d)“Early college credit” means college credit earned by a pupil through participation in courses and programs, including, but not limited to, dual enrollment, dual credit, and advanced placement courses and programs, before graduating high school.(e)“Internship” means a supervised, structured, and guided work-based learning activity training that takes place in a workplace for a limited period of time that (1) is connected to a school-based program or course, (2) involves supervision of both school and workplace employees, (3) provides career experience and educational benefits to the intern, (4) is limited to the timeframe during which the work-based learning activity provides the intern with beneficial learning, and (5) is more than 25 hours in one semester, intersession, or summer school session.(f)“Job shadowing experience” means a visit to a workplace for the purpose of career exploration for no less than three hours and no more than 25 hours in one semester, intersession, or summer school session.(g)“Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or education joint powers authority.(h)“Mentorship” means a supervised, structured and guided work-based learning activity involving formal interactions between a youth participant and an adult mentor that (1) is established under the supervision and policies of the governing board or body of the local educational agency, (2) includes activities where the mentor offers career guidance to the mentee, and (3) may include workplace mentoring where the local program matches a youth participant with an employer or employee of a company.(i)“Preapprenticeship program” means a preapprenticeship program registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3100 of the Labor Code and Article 3 (commencing with Section 79140) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3.(j)“Related and supplemental instruction” has the same meaning as defined in Section 205 of Article 2 of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.(k)“School-based enterprise program” means a supervised, structured, and guided work-based learning activity involving a pupil-led entrepreneurial program that is part of a career technical education or academic program of study, that integrates current industry standards, and that involves the development and operation of a revenue-generating business, regardless of profit or loss, provided under Article 2 (commencing with Section 48930) of Chapter 6 of Part 27.(l)“Work-based learning” means (1) sustained interactions with industry or community professionals in real workplace settings, to the extent practicable, or (2) sustained interactions with industry or community professionals in simulated environments at an educational institution that fosters in-depth, firsthand engagement with the tasks required in a given career field that are aligned to curriculum and instruction.(m)“Work experience education” means a course of study that combines an on-the-job component with classroom instruction. “Work experience education” may be established by the governing board or body of a local educational agency pursuant to this article or Article 4 (commencing with Section 10070) of Subchapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(n)“Youth apprentice” means a registered apprentice who meets all of the following:(1)Is at least 16 years of age.(2)Is enrolled full-time in high school in grade 10, 11, or 12, or is enrolled in an adult education program.(3)Is participating in a registered apprenticeship program with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, pursuant to Section 3368 of the Labor Code and Section 51769.(o)“Youth apprenticeship program” means an apprenticeship program registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards that fulfills all registered apprenticeship requirements and serves youth between 16 and 24 years of age at the time of enrollment and that also meets all of the following:(1)Offers related and supplemental instruction through career technical education, work experience education, early college credit, or other academic courses, whenever possible.(2)Complies with labor laws for minors.(3)Offers flexible work hours to allow for pupils to participate in on-the-job training while they are enrolled in high school.(4)Allows for part-time employment and extended completion time to accommodate student apprentices.SEC. 4.SEC. 5. Section 51760 of the Education Code is amended to read:51760. The governing body or board of a local educational agency or state special school maintaining a high school may do all of the following:(a) Provide for the instruction of pupils in the skills, attitudes, and understanding necessary to succeed in employment by means of courses that include work-based learning activities or work experience education programs as provided in this article.(b) Provide for guidance and supervision procedures designed to ensure maximum educational benefit to pupils from placement in suitable work-based learning activities occurring in work experience education programs or career technical education, or early college credit, or other academic courses. credit.(c) Provide for arranging, approving, coordinating, and awarding credit for work-based learning occurring in work experience education programs or career technical education, or early college credit, or other academic courses, credit, and for those purposes employ instructors, coordinators, and other necessary personnel.(d) Provide for the local educational agency or state special school to purchase workers’ compensation and liability insurance for pupils enrolled in programs of study involving work experience education courses, work-based learning activities, and registered apprenticeships and preapprenticeships at locations off school grounds approved by the appropriate governing body or board, or require employers to purchase insurance and to pass on all or a portion of the costs, at the discretion of the appropriate governing body or board, to the local educational agency. agency or state special school.SEC. 5.SEC. 6. Section 51760.1 of the Education Code is amended to read:51760.1. (a) Consistent with the most recent state plans on career technical education, work-based learning activities for pupils may be delivered by local educational agencies, state special schools, partnership academies conducted pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 54690) of Chapter 9 of Part 29, regional occupational programs, as defined in Section 52303, and regional occupational centers. Work-based learning activities may include, but are not limited to, on-the-job training in school-based registered apprenticeships, youth apprenticeship programs, internships, mentorships, and job shadowing experiences. Work-based learning activities may be offered through work experience education courses, community classrooms, cooperative career technical education programs, career technical education courses, early college credit courses, and other academic courses.(b) School districts Local educational agencies, state special schools, and community colleges that receive funding to provide career technical education programs may include and fund a work-based learning activity component in courses and programs described in subdivision (a).(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in paragraph (2), all pupils participating in work-based learning activities shall be afforded the same statutory and regulatory safeguards as pupils in work experience programs.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be construed to alter the minutes of a minimum schoolday that apply for work experience programs.(d) When feasible, work-based learning activities should be an integral part of a more comprehensive program that integrates academic courses and career technical education.(e) High-quality work-based learning activities shall be offered in conjunction with labor, business, and industry, and may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:(1) Emphasis on learning in the workplace.(2) Exposure to a wide range of career areas and worksites to help youth make informed choices about education, training options, and career pursuits.(3) Thoughtful placement of pupils into opportunities that are evaluated for their safety, qualified supervision, and learning opportunities.(4) Appropriate sequencing of activities offered pursuant to this article based upon the pupil’s age and maturity.(5) Explicit aim to supplement, or systematically reinforce, classroom instruction in career technical education courses, work experience education courses, and early college credit courses, and academic courses.(6) Systematic attention to the development of 21st century skills, such as communication, creativity, problem solving, teamwork, project planning, and critical thinking.(7) A trained mentor or supervisor who structures the learning at the worksite.(8) Coordination between the classroom teacher and the workplace mentor or supervisor.(9) Built-in regular assessment and feedback.(10) Involvement of youth in choosing and structuring the experience.(11) Clear and measurable learning outcomes.(f) Local educational agencies and state special schools are encouraged to work with local workforce development board youth councils and workforce development boards to maximize the use of available resources for youth employment opportunities by coordinating work-based learning activities and facilitating work-based learning regional planning.SEC. 6.SEC. 7. Section 51760.2 of the Education Code is amended to read:51760.2. Local workforce development boards, in conjunction with local educational agencies agencies, state special schools, and community colleges, and any other representatives deemed appropriate, including, but not limited to, labor, business, commerce, and industry representatives, research centers, and parents, may develop principles and guidelines for the establishment of work-based learning activities. If these organizations develop principles and guidelines pursuant to this section, all of the following shall occur:(a) The organizations shall consider existing guidelines or regulations relating to the work-based learning activities described in this article, the state’s most recent career technical education plans, and the most current academic and career technical education standards and frameworks adopted by the state board.(b) The guidelines shall include specific guidance to local educational agencies agencies, state special schools, and community colleges on ensuring that a pupil’s work-based learning activities are linked directly to academic or career technical education learning objectives and provide the necessary skills for the pupil to use in future employment and career-focused postsecondary education opportunities.(c) The guidelines shall align regional coordinating efforts with an emphasis on strengthening employer engagement and identify identifying critical skills for the workplace and expanding work-based learning activities in partnership with community colleges and local workforce development boards.SEC. 7.SEC. 8. Section 51760.3 of the Education Code is amended to read:51760.3. The governing board or body of a school district local educational agency or state special school offering a work experience education program pursuant to Section 51760 shall grant credit to pupils for satisfactorily completing work experience education courses, in an amount not to exceed a total of 40 semester credits, of which no more than 10 credits may be conferred in any one semester, provided the pupil meets all of the following requirements:(a) At the time of enrollment, the pupil is at least 16 years of age. Pupils under 16 years of age may receive credit for work experience education under all of the following conditions:(1) The pupil is enrolled in grade 10 or a higher grade.(2) The principal of the school where the pupil is enrolled certifies that the pupil is in need of immediate work experience education in order to pursue employment opportunities.(3) The principal of the school where the pupil is enrolled certifies that there is a probability that the pupil will no longer be enrolled as a full-time pupil without being provided the opportunity to enroll in a work experience education program.(4) The pupil is at least 14 years of age and the principal in the school where the pupil is enrolled certifies that it is necessary for the pupil’s participation in a career technical education program.(5) The pupil’s individualized education program, adopted pursuant to the requirements of Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000), prescribes the type of training deemed appropriate for participation in a work experience education program.(b) During the course of the pupil’s enrollment in the program, the pupil receives as a minimum the equivalent of one instructional period per week of classroom instruction or counseling by a certificated employee. The instruction or counseling shall be offered in sessions scheduled intermittently throughout the semester.(c) The work experience education program meets all of the requirements of law governing these programs.SEC. 8.SEC. 9. Section 51762.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:51762.5. The Superintendent shall adopt standards for local work experience education plans required by subdivision (b) of Section 46300. Local educational agencies and state special schools offering work-based learning activities shall document and maintain records of these activities occurring in work experience education programs and career technical education, and early college credit, and academic courses, credit, and may include these activities as part of their work experience education plans. The adopted standards for these local work experience education plans shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(a) Selection and approval of work stations.(b) Classroom instruction.(c) Supervision of pupils.(d) Formal training agreements.(e) Paid and unpaid work-based learning activities provided pursuant to this article.(f) Academic credit for participation in work experience education courses.(g) Youth apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs.(h) Career technical education courses or other academic courses offering work-based learning activities.(i) Pupil demographic and enrollment data.(j) Work permits issued to pupils.SEC. 9.SEC. 10. Section 51763 of the Education Code is amended to read:51763. All laws or rules applicable to minors in employment relationships are applicable to pupils enrolled in work experience education courses or participating in youth apprenticeship programs or other work-based learning activities provided pursuant to this article.SEC. 10.SEC. 11. Section 51764 of the Education Code is amended to read:51764. Work experience education as authorized by this article includes the employment of pupils in part-time jobs and registered apprenticeships youth apprenticeship programs selected or approved as having educational value for the pupils employed and coordinated by school employees.SEC. 11.SEC. 12. Section 51766 of the Education Code is amended to read:51766. (a) Work experience education involving registered apprenticeships or apprenticeable occupations youth apprenticeship programs shall be consistent with the purposes of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code and with standards established by the California Apprenticeship Council for programs in the building and construction trades and for firefighters or by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations for other programs.(b) Work experience education programs involving preapprenticeship shall be consistent with Section 3100 of the Labor Code.SEC. 12.SEC. 13. Section 51767 of the Education Code is amended to read:51767. (a) The governing board of any school district or body of any local educational agency or state special school maintaining one or more high schools may provide for the establishment placement and supervision of registered youth apprenticeship programs and work experience education programs in areas outside of the school district, local educational agency or state special school, either within this state or in a contiguous state.SEC. 13.SEC. 14. Section 51768 of the Education Code is amended to read:51768. (a) The governing board or body of a local educational agency providing work-based learning activities and a work experience education program may provide for employment under the program of pupils in part-time jobs located in areas outside of the local educational agency, either within the state or in a contiguous state, and the employment may be provided by a public or private employer. The governing board or body may pay wages to persons receiving the training whether assigned inside or outside of the local educational agency, and may provide liability and workers’ compensation insurance as necessary. However, payments may not be made to or for private employers with the exception of apprenticeship program sponsors offering direct services and support to school-based youth apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs registered pursuant to this article. employers. However, wages to individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, may be paid to or for private employers as part of work experience programs funded through the annual Budget Act for these individuals.(b) (1) The governing board or body of a local educational agency may provide for direct costs associated with the implementation of a school-based preapprenticeship or youth apprenticeship program registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, including, but not limited to, on-the-job training, liability and workers’ compensation insurance, and program administration.(2) Except as provided in Section 3074.7 of the Labor Code, no charge or fee shall be required to be paid by a pupil, or the pupil’s parent or guardian, for the pupil’s participation in a preapprenticeship or youth apprenticeship program registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards as described in paragraph (1).(c)Wages to individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, may be paid to or for private employers as part of work experience programs funded through the annual Budget Act for these individuals.SEC. 14.SEC. 15. Section 51769 of the Education Code is repealed.SEC. 15.SEC. 16. Section 51769 is added to the Education Code, to read:51769. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this article or the Labor Code, local educational agencies and regional occupational centers or programs may be considered employers of pupils participating in work-based learning activities, including a school-based youth apprenticeship program, that occurs in conjunction with work experience education, career technical education, or early college credit, and other academic courses. credit.(b) Local educational agencies may provide workers’ compensation and liability insurance for student youth apprentices on behalf of a registered youth apprenticeship program sponsor, private employer, or an employer that is not the administrating school entity consistent with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3200) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Labor Code for work-based learning activities occurring during and outside of the schoolday when the pupil is earning credit towards graduation from high school and those work-based learning activities occurring outside of the schoolday are connected to a school-based program and monitored by the school.(c) Whenever a work-based learning activity is under the supervision of a regional occupational center or program operated by two or more school districts pursuant to Section 52301, the school district of residence of the persons receiving the training shall be deemed responsible for supervision of the pupil for the purposes of this section.SEC. 16.SEC. 17. Section 51769.1 is added to the Education Code, to read:51769.1. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a youth apprenticeship program that begins in high school shall allow student youth apprentices to complete a percentage of their program before graduation from high school.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, all high school-based youth apprenticeship programs registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3073 of the Labor Code shall meet all the following requirements:(1) Submit copies of approved youth apprenticeship standards and implementation plans to the department.(2) Allow						student youth apprentices who complete a percentage of their hours before high school graduation to complete a full apprenticeship under the supervision of the approved local educational agency or the apprenticeship program sponsor or transfer to an adjacent apprenticeship program in another region in the state, when possible.(3) Offer related and supplemental instruction, provided the courses meet all of the following:(A) Address the required competencies.(B) Are approved by the apprenticeship program sponsor, employer, and the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.(C) Are offered as part of a career technical education, work experience education, or early college credit, or other academic course. credit.(4) Award student youth apprentices credit for graduation for paid on-the-job training, provided that the training meets both of the following:(A) Occurs as part of a work experience education program as described in Section 51764.(B) Is offered in conjunction with related and supplemental instruction.(5) A student youth apprentice may complete paid on-the-job training with a private employer or apprenticeship program sponsor registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards during the schoolday as part of a work experience education course and receive course credit towards graduation pursuant to Section 51760.3.(6) While attending paid on-the-job training or related and supplemental instruction courses that occur outside of the schoolday and are offered by a registered apprenticeship program sponsor or private employer, the local educational agency may serve as an employer of record if the student youth apprentice is receiving credit towards graduation for the on-the-job training and related and supplemental instruction as part of a work experience education, or career technical education, or academic course. education.SEC. 17.SEC. 18. Section 52372.3 is added to the Education Code, to read:52372.3. The governing board of a school district, the governing board of a joint powers regional occupational center or program, or a county superintendent of schools that establishes and maintains cooperative career technical education programs or community classrooms pursuant to this article may include in those programs work-based learning activities consistent with Article 7 6.5 (commencing with Section 51759) 51755) of Chapter 5, including, but not limited to, internships, mentorships, job shadowing experiences, preapprenticeship programs, registered and youth apprenticeship programs, and youth apprenticeship opportunities. programs.SEC. 18.Section 52376 of the Education Code is amended to read:52376.(a)The governing board of a school district that maintains a high school may expend, if consistent with the allowable uses of the funding, local control funding formula funding and career technical education funding, including, but not limited to, funding provided for the California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program, the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program, partnership academies conducted pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 54690) of Chapter 9 of Part 29, and the federal Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Improvement Act of 2006 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 2301 et seq.), for the purposes of this section.(b)The governing board of a school district that elects to use funding described in subdivision (a) for the purposes of this section shall do both of the following:(1)Establish district policies and procedures to systematically review career technical education classes offered by the district to determine the degree to which each class may offer an alternative means for completing and receiving credit for specific portions of the district’s prescribed course of study to graduate from high school. The governing board shall ensure that those classes are equivalent, in terms of content and rigor, to the courses prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3.(2)Establish district policies and procedures to compare, not less than every three years, the local curriculum, course content, and course sequence of career technical education programs in the district with the state model curriculum standards for career technical education.(c)A governing board expending the funding described in subdivision (a) for the purposes of this section shall develop and implement, independently or in consultation with the regional occupational center or program and community college serving the geographic area of the school district, a career technical education program that meets at least all of the following criteria:(1)Provides a series of career technical education programs, each of which offers a sequence of at least two courses leading to specific competencies that will enable pupils to attain entry level employment in business or industry upon graduation from high school. Whenever possible, the plan to provide a series of career technical education programs shall be consistent with local agreements with regional occupational centers and programs and community colleges regarding the responsibilities for the provision and articulation of services among those local agencies. Each governing board shall also develop and implement plans for articulation of career technical education courses with the community colleges to establish opportunities for pupils to earn college credit, to allow pupils who complete K–12 career technical education pathways to meet prerequisite requirements for community college career education certificates and degree programs, and to align the sequence of courses through grades 13 and 14.(2)Conducts or obtains access to needs data and assessment of local, regional, and statewide business and industry to ensure that the career technical education programs offered will prepare pupils in competencies for which employment opportunities exist.(3)Provides counseling and guidance services to pupils to help them meet all necessary requirements for high school graduation and make informed career preparation choices. Counseling and guidance services provided to promote the purposes of this section may include counseling for pupils in grades 6 to 12, inclusive.(4)Involves business and industry in cooperative projects with schools to provide work-based learning activities consistent with Article 7 (commencing with Section 51759) of Chapter 5, including internships, mentorships, job shadowing experiences, student-led enterprise programs, preapprenticeship programs, registered apprenticeship programs, and youth apprenticeship opportunities.(5)Provides access to employment placement services to help graduating pupils obtain employment.(6)Includes a system of data collection to report annually to the governing board on the success or failure of each career technical education program in terms of all of the following:(A)Pupils achieving the desired competencies.(B)Pupils securing employment, particularly in jobs related to the area of their career technical preparation.(C)Pupils proceeding to advanced education and training at the postsecondary level.(D)Number and types of career technical classes offered and the number of those classes that qualify as alternative means to complete the prescribed course of study pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51225.3.(E)Number of pupils enrolled in career technical classes.(7)Ensures pupils have access to career technical education pathways that align with regional and statewide workforce priorities and registered apprenticeship programs.(8)Ensures teachers instructing a career technical education course have been issued the appropriate designated subjects career technical education or single subject teaching credential.(d)The department may adopt any policies, rules, and regulations necessary to maintain the educational purpose and character of career technical education and school-based registered apprenticeship programs.SEC. 19. Section 52455 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 52454, to read:52455. Funding provided for purposes of this article may, if consistent with the allowable uses of that funding, be used to support agricultural career technical education programs that provide work-based learning activities, including, but not limited to, supervised occupational experiences and internships, consistent with Article 7 6.5 (commencing with Section 51759) 51755) of Chapter 5.SEC. 20. Section 53026 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 53025, to read:53026. Grants provided pursuant to this chapter may be awarded, if consistent with the allowable uses of funding provided for purposes of this chapter, to pathway programs that provide work-based learning activities consistent with Article 7 6.5 (commencing with Section 51759) 51755) of Chapter 5, including, but not limited to, career-connected learning opportunities, internships, mentorships, preapprenticeship programs, registered and youth apprenticeship programs, and youth apprenticeship opportunities. programs.SEC. 21. Section 53071.2 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 53071.1, to read:53071.2. Grants provided pursuant to this chapter may be awarded, if consistent with the allowable uses of funding provided for purposes of this chapter, to pathway programs that provide work-based learning activities consistent with Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 51755) of Chapter 5, including, but not limited to, career-connected learning opportunities, internships, mentorships, preapprenticeship programs, and youth apprenticeship programs.SEC. 21.SEC. 22. Section 54698 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 54697, to read:54698. Funding provided for purposes of this article may be used, if consistent with the allowable uses of that funding, to support partnership academies that provide work-based learning opportunities consistent with Article 7 6.5 (commencing with Section 51759) 51755) of Chapter 5 of Part 28, including, but not limited to, internships, mentorships, preapprenticeship programs, registered youth apprenticeship programs, and youth apprenticeship opportunities. programs.SEC. 22.SEC. 23. Section 56474.5 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 56474, to read:56474.5. (a) Transition and employment preparation services provided pursuant to this article may include, if consistent with the allowable uses of funding provided for purposes of this article, work-based learning activities consistent with Article 7 6.5 (commencing with Section 51759) 51755) of Chapter 5 of Part 28, including, but not limited to, career-connected learning opportunities, job shadowing experiences, internships, mentorships, and preapprenticeship programs designed to prepare pupils with disabilities for competitive integrated employment, postsecondary education, or vocational training.(b) Work-based learning activities offered pursuant to this section shall comply with applicable labor laws governing minors, including those governing workers with disabilities, and shall be consistent with each participating pupil’s individualized education program adopted pursuant to this part.SEC. 23.SEC. 24. Section 76004.5 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 76004, to read:76004.5. (a) A College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement entered into pursuant to Section 76004 may include, if consistent with allowable uses of funding provided for purposes of Section 76004, work-based learning activities consistent with Article 7 6.5 (commencing with Section 51759) 51755) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 when those work-based learning activities are integrated into career technical education or other academic coursework offered pursuant to the College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement and designed to provide career experience and educational benefits to participating pupils.(b) Work-based learning components included in a College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement pursuant to subdivision (a) shall identify the supervising certificated employee or coordinator for the work-based learning activities and specify how the activities connect to course learning objectives.SEC. 24.SEC. 25. Section 79149.8 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 79149.7, to read:79149.8. (a) Programs and partnerships established pursuant to this article may include, if consistent with allowable uses of funding provided for purposes of this article, work-based learning activities consistent with Article 7 6.5 (commencing with Section 51759) 51755) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2, including, but not limited to, preapprenticeship programs and apprenticeship-aligned career pathways.(b) Work-based learning opportunities offered pursuant to this article shall be coordinated with participating local educational agencies, state special schools, apprenticeship program sponsors, local workforce development boards, and community colleges to support seamless transitions between secondary and postsecondary education, workforce training, and registered youth apprenticeship programs.SEC. 25.SEC. 26. Section 88834 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 88833, to read:88834. Funding allocated to community college districts and regional consortia pursuant to this part may be used, if consistent with the allowable uses of that funding, to support career technical education programs that provide work-based learning activities consistent with Article 7 6.5 (commencing with Section 51759) 51755) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2, including, but not limited to, apprenticeship-aligned career pathways, internships, mentorships, preapprenticeship programs, registered programs and youth apprenticeship programs, and youth apprenticeship opportunities. programs.SEC. 26.SEC. 27. Section 3100 of the Labor Code is amended to read:3100. (a) On or before January 1, 2019, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards shall develop a process to approve preapprenticeship programs for purposes of establishing eligibility for any state programs.(b) (1) A program seeking approval as a preapprenticeship program shall submit to the Division of Apprenticeship Standards a request for approval, on a form developed by the division.(2) The request for approval shall include documentation evidencing that the program’s preapprenticeship training activities meet either of the following requirements: (A) The activities are conducted in partnership with one or more apprenticeship programs approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.(B) The activities are conducted with the approval by a local building and construction trades council of the use of the multicraft core curriculum for the preapprenticeships program.(3) Valid documentation for purposes of this section shall include a copy of a memorandum of understanding or other formal written agreement that does all the following:(A) Verifies either of the following, as applicable: (i) The apprenticeship program’s support for the preapprenticeship program.(ii) The local building and construction trades council’s approval of the use of the multicraft core curriculum for the preapprenticeship program.(B) Gives priority but not a guarantee to preapprenticeship graduates for acceptance into the apprenticeship program.(C) Makes a commitment as to the number of preapprenticeship graduates that may be accepted into the apprenticeship program.(c) To qualify for approval, a preapprenticeship program shall include the following elements:(1) Training and curriculum based on industry standards and approved by the documented registered apprenticeship program partner or partners that will prepare individuals with the skills and competencies needed to enter one or more registered apprenticeship programs.(2) Strategies that increase registered apprenticeship opportunities for underrepresented, disadvantaged, or low-skilled individuals, such that, upon completion, those individuals will meet the entry requirements, gain consideration, and be prepared for success in one or more registered apprenticeship programs. These strategies include any of the following:(A) Strong recruitment efforts focused on outreach to populations underrepresented in local, state, and national registered apprenticeship programs.(B) Educational and prevocational services that prepare individuals to meet the entry requisites of one or more registered apprenticeship programs, such as specific career and industry awareness workshops, job readiness courses, English for speakers of other languages, adult basic education, financial literacy seminars, and mathematics tutoring.(C) Exposing participants to local, state, and national registered apprenticeship programs and providing direct assistance to participants applying to those programs.(D) Facilitating access to appropriate support services during both the preapprenticeship program and a significant portion of the registered apprenticeship program.(E) Efforts to sustain the ongoing partnership between the preapprenticeship program and registered apprenticeship program partner or partners, including collaborative efforts that promote alignment with the California Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (WIOA) Unified Strategic Workforce Development Plan and use of the registered apprenticeship program as a preferred means for employers to develop a skilled workforce and create career opportunities for individuals.(F) Providing physical preparedness training for jobs where physical ability and endurance are key elements of success.(G) Providing training on safe working practices where applicable to the job.(H) Providing hands-on training to individuals in a simulated lab experience or through volunteer opportunities that accurately simulate industry and occupational conditions while observing proper supervision and safety protocols, provided that such experience and opportunities do not supplant or reduce the compensable work of paid employees.(I) Providing for automatic acceptance or priority credits for acceptance into apprenticeship programs of individuals who have successfully completed the preapprenticeship program, and when applicable, giving advance credit in the apprenticeship program for skills and competencies already acquired in the preapprenticeship program.(d) Preapprenticeship programs shall be evaluated and approved based on a determination of the strengths of the elements described in subdivision (c), as demonstrated in the application.(e) Approval of a preapprenticeship program shall expire in three years unless the program requests and obtains renewal of its approval by the division. Renewed approval shall be based on the program’s success in implementing the elements described in subdivision (c).(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Local building and construction trades council” means a multicraft labor council affiliated with the State Building and Construction Trades Council of California.(2) “Multicraft core curriculum” means the multicraft core curriculum implemented by the State Department of Education for a pilot project with partnership academies established pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 54690) of Chapter 9 of Part 29 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code and by the California Workforce Development Board and local workforce development boards.SEC. 27.SEC. 28. Section 3100.5 is added to the Labor Code, to read:3100.5. (a) Preapprenticeship programs approved pursuant to Section 3100 may coordinate with and be offered in conjunction with work-based learning activities, work experience education programs, career technical education courses, cooperative career technical education programs, community classrooms, dual enrollment, and other educational pathway programs consistent with Article 7 6.5 (commencing with Section 51759) 51755) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code.(b) A local educational agency may participate in a preapprenticeship program approved pursuant to Section 3100 as an educational partner and may provide related and supplemental instruction, career technical education coursework, and academic course credit that supports the preapprenticeship program’s curriculum and competencies, consistent with the requirements of Section 3100 and the applicable provisions of the Education Code.(c) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or education or regional occupation center or program operated by a county office of education or a joint powers authority.SEC. 28.SEC. 29. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.